Wisconsin, session 2025, AB975.
do enact as follows:AB975,13Section 1. 346.89 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB975,1,74346.89 (4) (a) Subject to sub. (3), no person who holds a probationary license 5issued under s. 343.085, or an instruction permit issued under s. 343.07, may drive, 6as defined in s. 343.305 (1) (b), any motor vehicle while using a cellular or other 7wireless telephone, except to report an emergency.AB975,28Section 2. Initial applicability.AB975,2,21(1) This act first applies to violations committed on the effective date of this 2subsection.AB975,2,33